Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska69-2301
Act, how cited.

Sections 69-2301 to 69-2314 shall be known and may be cited as the Disposition of Personal Property Landlord and Tenant Act.

Laws 1991, LB 36, § 1.